Utah statutes.
57-16-2.   Purpose of chapter.
The fundamental right to own and protect land and to establish conditions for
its use by others necessitate that the owner of a mobile home park be provided
with speedy and adequate remedies against those who abuse the terms of a
tenancy. The high cost of moving mobile homes, the requirements of mobile home
parks relating to their installation, and the cost of landscaping and lot
preparation necessitate that the owners of mobile homes occupied within mobile
home parks be provided with protection from actual or constructive eviction.
It is the purpose of this chapter to provide protection for both the owners of
mobile homes located in mobile home parks and for the owners of mobile home
parks.
